Nebraska, session 109, LB225.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB225 LB225
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-168, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-168 (1) In the event of a lost or mutilated certificate of title,
the owner of the vehicle or the holder of a lien on the vehicle shall
apply, upon a form prescribed by the department, to the department or to
any county treasurer for a duplicate certificate of title and shall pay
the fee prescribed by section 60-156. The application shall be signed and
sworn to by the person making the application or a person authorized to
sign under section 60-151. Thereupon the county treasurer, with the
approval of the department, or the department shall issue a duplicate
certificate of title to the person entitled to receive the certificate of
title. If the records of the title have been destroyed pursuant to
section 60-152, the county treasurer shall issue a duplicate certificate
of title to the person entitled to receive the same upon such showing as
the county treasurer may deem sufficient. If the applicant cannot produce
such proof of ownership, he or she may apply directly to the department
and submit such evidence as he or she may have, and the department may,
if it finds the evidence sufficient, authorize the county treasurer to
issue a duplicate certificate of title. A duplicate certificate of title
so issued shall show only those unreleased liens of record. The new
purchaser shall be entitled to receive an original certificate of title
upon presentation of the assigned duplicate copy of the certificate of
title, properly assigned to the new purchaser, to the county treasurer
prescribed in section 60-144.
(2) Any purchaser of a vehicle for which a certificate of title was
lost or mutilated may at the time of purchase require the seller of the
same to indemnify him or her and all subsequent purchasers of the vehicle
against any loss which he, she, or they may suffer by reason of any claim
presented upon the original certificate. In the event of the recovery of
the original certificate of title by the owner, he or she shall forthwith
surrender the same to the county treasurer or the department for
-2-

LB225 LB225
2025 2025
cancellation.
Sec. 2. Original section 60-168, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-